District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.63

Repealed

Deposit of money with Mayor — Proof of financial responsibility.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 136, ch. 222, § 63
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1973 Ed., § 40-479.
1981 Ed., § 40-463.